Hawaii statutes.
§334-75 Authorized absence. The
administrator of a psychiatric facility or the administrator’s deputy may grant
authorized absence from the facility to any patient upon such terms and
conditions as the administrator or the administrator’s deputy may deem
advisable, and, as to a patient admitted or committed on court order, with the
prior approval of the court for periods in excess of thirty days, and without
the approval of the court for periods up to thirty days, or, as to a patient
transferred under section 334-74, with the prior approval of the official
effecting the transfer; provided that if a patient has been admitted or
committed on court order after having been charged with a felony or misdemeanor
pursuant to chapter 707, an absence can be authorized only with the prior
approval of the court, except where the absence is supervised by the presence
of someone from the facility. [L 1967, c 259, pt of §1; HRS §334-75; am L 1972,
c 141, §1; am L 1982, c 42, §1; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Court approval is necessary to authorize leaves from
psychiatric facility even if patient has been acquitted of the chapter 707
charges. 69 H. 370, 742 P.2d 373.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next